Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.08.060

Expenses of commission members—Consultants and assistants.

Members of the charter commission shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed by the city from any funds for their necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The legislative body may, in its discretion, make a reasonable appropriation of the city funds to provide for public information and discussion concerning the purposes and progress of the commission's work and/or to provide technical or clerical assistance to the commission in its work. Within the limits of any such appropriation and privately contributed funds and services as may be available to it, the charter commission may appoint one or more consultants and clerical or other assistants to serve at the pleasure of the commission and may fix a reasonable compensation to be paid such consultants and assistants.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.060.]